District of Columbia statutes.
7-531.06

Advisory committees.

Each sponsor shall have an advisory committee composed of persons skilled in the provision of targeted services and persons who represent or advocate the interests of eligible persons. An advisory committee shall monitor the sponsor’s compliance with program requirements, make recommendations to the sponsor on program implementation, and carry out any other program-related tasks that the Mayor deems appropriate.

Sept. 13, 1986, D.C. Law 6-143, § 7, 33 DCR 4372

History

1981 Ed., § 6-2246.

Prior Codifications